Hawaii statutes.
§342P-6 Emergency powers;
procedures. (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, if the
governor or the director determines that an imminent peril to the public health
and safety is or will be caused by an emission of asbestos or the presence of
lead hazards that requires immediate action, the governor or the director,
without a public hearing, may order any person causing or contributing to the
emission or lead hazards to immediately reduce or stop the emission or creating
the lead hazard, and may take any and all other actions as may be necessary.
The order shall fix a place and time, not later than twenty-four hours
thereafter, for a hearing to be held before the director.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to limit any power that the governor or any other officer may have to declare
an emergency or to act on the basis of such a declaration, if the power is
conferred by statute or constitutional provision or inheres in the office. [L
1991, c 219, pt of §1; am L 1995, c 201, §7; am L 1998, c 242, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next